Georgia, session 2025_26, HB931.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
15 SECTION 1.
16 (a) The purpose of this Act is to protect the safety, health, and economic well-being of
H. B. 931
- 1 -

25 LC 52 0858
17 Georgians by taking steps to increase access to affordable prescription drugs. In enacting
18 this Act, the legislature finds that:
19 (1) Access to prescription drugs is necessary for Georgians to maintain or acquire good
20 health;
21 (2) Excessive costs negatively impact the ability of Georgians to obtain prescription
22 drugs, and costs that exceed reasonable levels endanger the health and safety of
23 Georgians and their ability to maintain or achieve good health;
24 (3) Lack of affordability of prescription drugs threatens the economic well-being of
25 Georgians and endangers their ability to afford other necessary and essential goods and
26 services, including housing, food, and utilities;
27 (4) Excessive costs for prescription drugs contribute significantly to healthcare and
28 health insurance costs and threaten the overall ability of Georgians to obtain healthcare
29 coverage and maintain or achieve good health;
30 (5) The high cost of prescription drugs contributes significantly to rising costs to the state
31 for healthcare provided and paid for through health insurance programs for public
32 employees, including employees of the state, municipalities and counties, school districts,
33 institutions of higher education, and retirees whose healthcare costs are funded by public
34 programs, thereby threatening the ability of the state to fund those programs adequately
35 and further threatening the ability of the state to fund other programs necessary for the
36 public good, such as public education and public safety; and
37 (6) The costs to consumers, health benefit plans, and the state for prescription drug
38 coverage is higher than the costs in other countries because the prices charged by
39 manufacturers and distributors of drugs in Georgia are higher.
40 (b) Based on these findings, the legislature finds that high costs of prescription drugs
41 threaten the safety and well-being of Georgians and finds it is necessary to act in order to
42 protect Georgians from the negative impact of excessive costs for prescription drugs.
H. B. 931
- 2 -

25 LC 52 0858
43 SECTION 2.
44 Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to health, is amended in Chapter
45 2, relating to Department of Community Health, by designating Code Sections 31-2-1
46 through 31-2-19 as Article 1.
47 SECTION 3.
48 Said title is further amended in said chapter by adding a new article to read as follows:
49 "ARTICLE 2
50 31-2-30.
51 As used in this article, the term:
52 (1) 'Affordability challenge' means a determination by the board that the costs of
53 appropriate utilization of a prescription drug:
54 (A) Exceed the therapeutic benefit of such drug; or
55 (B) Are not sustainable to consumers or to public or private healthcare systems.
56 (2) 'Biological product' means a virus, therapeutic serum, toxin, antitoxin, vaccine,
57 blood, blood component or derivative, allergenic product, protein, or analogous product,
58 or arsphenamine or derivative of arsphenamine or any other trivalent organic arsenic
59 compound, applicable to the prevention, treatment, or cure of a disease or condition of
60 human beings.
61 (3) 'Biosimilar product' means a biological product highly similar to a reference
62 biological product with no clinically meaningful differences in terms of the safety, purity,
63 and potency of the product and with minor differences in clinically inactive components.
64 (4) 'Board' means the Prescription Drug Affordability Board established under Code
65 Section 31-2-31.
H. B. 931
- 3 -

25 LC 52 0858
66 (5) 'ERISA plan' means a plan qualified under the federal Employee Retirement Income
67 Security Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. Section 1001, et seq.
68 (6) 'Health benefit plan' means any hospital, health, or medical insurance policy; hospital
69 or medical service contract; employee welfare benefit plan; contract or agreement with
70 a health maintenance organization; subscriber contract or agreement; contract or
71 agreement with a preferred provider organization; accident and sickness insurance benefit
72 plan; or other insurance contract under any other name. Such term shall include any
73 health insurance or benefit plan established pursuant to Part 6 of Article 17 of Chapter
74 2 of Title 20, Code Section 31-2-4, Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 45, and Article 7 of
75 Chapter 4 of Title 49, the 'Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977.'
76 (7) 'Manufacturer' means an entity that engages in the manufacture, marketing, or
77 distribution of a prescription drug or enters into an agreement with another manufacturer
78 to manufacture, market, or distribute a prescription drug under such entity's name and sets
79 or changes the wholesale acquisition cost of the prescription drug it manufactures,
80 markets, or distributes.
81 (8) 'Participating ERISA plan' means an ERISA plan that has elected to participate in the
82 requirements and restrictions as provided in Code Section 31-2-35.
83 (9) 'Pharmacy benefits manager' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
84 Section 33-64-1.
85 (10) 'Pharmacy wholesale distributor' means any person engaged in the wholesale
86 distribution of prescription drugs, including, but not limited to, manufacturers; repackers;
87 own label distributors; private-label distributors; jobbers; brokers; warehouses, including
88 manufacturers' and distributors' warehouses, chain drug warehouses, and wholesale drug
89 warehouses; independent wholesale drug traders; and retail pharmacies that conduct
90 wholesale distributions.
91 (11) 'Prescription drug' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section
92 26-4-201. Such term shall include any biological product or biosimilar product.
H. B. 931
- 4 -

25 LC 52 0858
93 (12) 'State entity' means any agency of state government that purchases prescription
94 drugs on behalf of the state for a person whose healthcare is paid for by the state,
95 including any agent, vendor, fiscal agent, contractor, or other party acting on behalf of
96 the state.
97 (13) 'Wholesale acquisition cost' has the same meaning as set forth in 42 U.S.C. Section
98 1395w-3a(c)(6)(B).
99 31-2-31.
100 (a) There is hereby established the Prescription Drug Affordability Board for the purpose
101 of protecting residents of this state, state and local governments, health benefit plans,
102 healthcare providers, pharmacies, and other stakeholders within the healthcare system in
103 this state from the high costs of prescription drugs.
104 (b)(1) The board shall consist of five members appointed by the Governor and confirmed
105 by the Senate. The Governor shall designate the initial terms of the members of the board
106 as follows: one member shall be appointed for one year, two members shall be appointed
107 for two years, and two members shall be appointed for three years. Thereafter, all
108 members shall serve for terms of four years and until their successors are appointed and
109 qualified.
110 (2) When a vacancy occurs for any reason other than expiration of term, the Governor
111 shall make an appointment to become immediately effective for the remainder of the
112 unexpired term. Any appointment made by the Governor when the Senate is not in
113 session shall be effective until the appointment is acted upon by the Senate.
114 (c) A board member shall:
115 (1) Be a resident of this state;
116 (2) Have an advanced degree, experience, or expertise in healthcare policy, healthcare
117 economics, or clinical medicine; and
H. B. 931
- 5 -

25 LC 52 0858
118 (3) Not be an employee or board member of or consultant to a manufacturer, pharmacy
119 benefits manager, health benefit plan, pharmacy wholesale distributor, or related trade
120 association.
121 (d)(1) The board shall elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson from among its
122 members, each to serve for a term of one year commencing on the first day of July each
123 year.
124 (2) The board shall have the authority to hire an executive director and staff necessary
125 to conduct the board's activity as provided in this article.
126 (e) The commissioner or his or her designee shall serve as an ex officio member of the
127 board, and the department shall provide staff support and may employ consultants,
128 investigators, or other staff as necessary for the board to carry out its duties.
129 (f) The board shall assess and collect an annual assessment on manufacturers, health
130 benefit plans, pharmacy benefits managers, and pharmacy wholesale distributors that sell
131 or offer for sale any prescription drugs to persons in this state. The board shall specify the
132 methodology for determining the amount of such assessment and the methodology and
133 timeline for collecting such assessment pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated and
134 adopted by the board.
135 (g) The board shall have the authority to enter into a contract with a third party for any
136 service necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the board.
137 (h) The board may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, and donations from private or
138 pubic sources for the purposes of this article; provided, however, that the board shall not
139 accept any gift, grant, or donation that creates a conflict of interest or the appearance of any
140 conflict of interest for any board member.
141 (i) Board members, department employees, and contractors providing services to or on
142 behalf of the board shall recuse themselves from any board activity in which they have a
143 conflict of interest. As used in this subsection, the term 'conflict of interest' means an
144 association, including a financial or personal association, that has the potential to bias or
H. B. 931
- 6 -

25 LC 52 0858
145 appear to bias an individual's decisions in matters related to the board or the activities of
146 the board.
147 (j) The board may establish advisory groups consisting of relevant stakeholders.
148 (k) The board has the authority to promulgate and adopt rules and regulations to allow it
149 to carry out its duties and powers under this article.
150 (l) A simple majority of the board's membership shall constitute a quorum for the purpose
151 of conducting business. Decisions of the board shall be determined by majority vote of
152 board members present.
153 (m) All meetings of the board shall be open to the public in accordance with Chapter 14
154 of Title 50, relating to open and public meetings, and all public records shall be subject to
155 disclosure in accordance with Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, relating to open records;
156 provided, however, that the board may hold executive sessions to discuss trade secrets or
157 proprietary information, and such information shall be confidential by law and privileged;
158 shall not be subject to disclosure under the provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title
159 50, relating to open records; shall not be subject to subpoena; and shall not be subject to
160 discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil action.
161 (n) The board shall meet at least quarterly at a time and place determined by the
162 chairperson. The board may also meet at other times and places specified by the call of the
163 chairperson or a majority of the board members.
164 (o) Each board member shall receive the daily expense allowance and travel
165 reimbursement as provided in Code Section 45-7-21 for actual attendance at board
166 meetings in this state.
167 31-2-32.
168 (a) The board shall select prescription drugs for affordability review from the categories
169 of prescription drugs identified pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section.
170 (b) Beginning January 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the board shall identify:
H. B. 931
- 7 -

25 LC 52 0858
171 (1) Prescription drugs that, as adjusted annually by the increase or decrease in the cost
172 of living for the previous calendar year, have:
173 (A) A wholesale acquisition cost of $3,000.00 or more per year; or
174 (B) A wholesale acquisition cost increase of $300.00 or more in the preceding 12
175 month period; or
176 (B) A wholesale acquisition cost increase of 200 percent or more in the preceding 12
177 months;
178 (2) Biosimilar products with an initial wholesale acquisition cost that is not at least 15
179 percent below the wholesale acquisition cost of the reference biological product at the
180 time the biosimilar product is launched;
181 (3) Prescription drugs referred to the board as possessing potential affordability
182 challenges;
183 (4) Prescription drugs referred to the board by any advisory group created by the board;
184 and
185 (5) The following information on categories of prescription drugs and premiums, based
186 on reports submitted annually from each health benefit plan:
187 (A) The 50 prescription drugs that are most frequently dispensed by pharmacies for
188 claims covered under such plan and the total number of paid claims for each such drug;
189 (B) The 50 prescription drugs that are most costly with respect to such plan based on
190 total annual spending and the annual amount paid for each such drug after any rebates
191 or other price concessions;
192 (C) The 50 prescription drugs with the greatest increase in expenditures under such
193 plan during the year preceding the year of the report, and, for each such drug, the
194 change in the amount expended under such plan in each year after any rebates or other
195 price concessions;
196 (D) The 50 prescription drugs that are most costly based on average out-of-pocket cost
197 per insured, member, or covered person under such plan;
H. B. 931
- 8 -

25 LC 52 0858
198 (E) Any impact on premiums of such plan from rebates, fees, and other remuneration
199 paid by manufacturers to such plan or its administrators or service providers with
200 respect to prescription drugs prescribed to insureds, members, or covered persons under
201 such plan, including, but not limited to:
202 (i) The amounts paid by manufacturers for each therapeutic class of drugs; and
203 (ii) The amounts by paid manufacturers for each of the 25 drugs that yielded the
204 highest amount of rebates and other remuneration under such plan during the prior
205 year; and
206 (F) Any reduction in premiums and out-of-pocket costs to insureds, members, or
207 covered persons under the plan.
208 (c) The reports submitted to the board by each health benefit plan as provided for in
209 paragraph (5) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall include the following information
210 for each prescription drug:
211 (1) Total annual spending by the plan after any rebates and other price concessions;
212 (2) Total annual spending by insureds, members, or covered persons under the plan;
213 (3) The number of insureds, members, or covered persons with a paid prescription drug
214 claim;
215 (4) Total dosage units dispensed; and
216 (5) The number of paid claims.
217 31-2-33.
218 (a) In performing an affordability review of a prescription drug, the board shall be
219 authorized to consider any documents and information relating to the manufacturer's
220 selection of the introductory price or any price increase of such drug, including documents
221 and information relating to:
222 (1) Life cycle management;
223 (2) The average cost of such drug;
H. B. 931
- 9 -

25 LC 52 0858
224 (3) Market competition and context;
225 (4) Projected revenue;
226 (5) The estimated cost-effectiveness of the drug;
227 (6) Off-label usage of the drug;
228 (7) Development and manufacturing costs; and
229 (8) Any consumer assistance programs funded by the manufacturer.
230 (b) To the extent practicable, the board shall access pricing information for prescription
231 drugs by:
232 (1) Accessing available information from the all-payer claims database in this state and
233 other states;
234 (2) Entering into an interagency agreement with any state entity to share information
235 collected by such entity;
236 (3) Entering into a memorandum of understanding with another state to which
237 manufacturers already report pricing information; and
238 (4) Accessing other publicly available pricing information.
239 31-2-34.
240 (a) The board shall be authorized to conduct an affordability review of any prescription
241 drug identified pursuant to Code Section 31-2-32 to determine whether the cost of such
242 drug poses an affordability challenge.
243 (b) When conducting an affordability review for a prescription drug, the board shall be
244 authorized to consider any of the following criteria:
245 (1) The relevant factors contributing to the price paid for the drug, including the
246 wholesale acquisition cost, discounts, rebates, or other price concessions;
247 (2) The average patient co-pay or other cost-sharing for the drug;
248 (3) The effect of the price on consumers' access to the drug in this state;
H. B. 931
- 10 -

25 LC 52 0858
249 (4) Whether the cost of the drug contributes to inequities in the availability of healthcare
250 to underserved communities in this state;
251 (5) The dollar value and accessibility of patient assistance programs offered by the
252 manufacturer for the drug;
253 (6) The price and availability of therapeutic alternatives;
254 (7) Input from any advisory groups established by the board;
255 (8) Input from patients affected by the condition or disease treated by the drug and
256 individuals with medical or scientific expertise related to the condition or disease treated
257 by the drug;
258 (9) Life cycle management;
259 (10) The average cost of the drug in this state;
260 (11) Market competition and context;
261 (12) Projected manufacturer revenue, if available;
262 (13) Off-label usage of the drug; and
263 (14) Any other relevant factors as determined by the board.
264 (c) Prior to conducting an affordability review under this Code section, the board shall
265 publish which prescription drugs are subject to such review and shall notify the
266 manufacturer of any prescription drug subject to review.
267 (d) At the conclusion of an affordability review under this Code section, the board shall
268 determine whether the cost of a reviewed prescription drug presents an affordability
269 challenge necessitating the establishment of an upper payment limit as provided for in
270 Code Section 33-2-35.
271 31-2-35.
272 (a) Prior to setting any upper payment limits, the board shall establish by rule a
273 methodology for setting upper payment limits.
H. B. 931
- 11 -

25 LC 52 0858
274 (b) The board may set an upper payment limit for each prescription drug for which it
275 determines there is an affordability challenge.
276 (c) The methodology used by the board to set an upper payment limit may take into
277 consideration:
278 (1) The cost of administering the prescription drug;
279 (2) The cost of delivering the prescription drug to patients;
280 (3) The status of the prescription drug on the drug shortage list published by the United
281 States Food and Drug Administration;
282 (4) The difference between the price of the drug in this state and other states and between
283 the price in the United States and in other countries;
284 (5) Other relevant administrative costs related to the production and delivery of the
285 prescription drug; and
286 (6) Other relevant criteria the board, accounting for any stakeholder input, determines
287 is necessary.
288 (d) The methodology determined by the board shall consider whether an upper payment
289 limit may help alleviate health disparities and inequitable outcomes for underserved
290 communities, people with disabilities, older adults, or any other socially, economically, or
291 environmentally disadvantaged group.
292 (e) The board shall not employ a measure or metric which assigns a reduced value to the
293 life extension provided by a prescription drug based on a pre-existing disability or chronic
294 health condition of the individuals whom the prescription drug would benefit.
295 (f) The board shall be authorized to suspend an upper payment limit if it determines that
296 there is a shortage of the drug in this state, unless the board determines that such shortage
297 was caused by a manufacturer or its agent.
298 (g) An upper payment limit for a prescription drug established by the board applies to all
299 purchases of the prescription drug and reimbursements for a claim for the drug when such
300 drug is dispensed or administered to an individual in this state in person, by mail, or by
H. B. 931
- 12 -

25 LC 52 0858
301 other means. An upper payment limit does not include a pharmacy dispensing fee, and
302 nothing in this article shall be interpreted to prevent a retail pharmacy from receiving a
303 payment that includes a dispensing fee above the upper payment limit.
304 (h) An ERISA plan may elect to be subject to the upper payment limits established by the
305 board.
306 (i) The board shall publish a list of prescription drugs for which it has set an upper
307 payment limit.
308 (j) Unless the board prescribes a specific effective date, upper payment limits established
309 by the board shall become effective six months after the adoption of the upper payment
310 limit and apply only to purchases, contracts, and plans that are issued on or renewed after
311 the effective date.
312 (k) The establishment of an upper payment limit shall constitute final agency action. Any
313 person or entity may request a contested case hearing, in accordance with the procedures
314 established for such hearings by Chapter 13 of Title 50, the 'Georgia Administrative
315 Procedure Act,' no later than 30 days after the decision is issued. The board shall consider
316 the appeal and issue a final decision concerning the appeal within 60 days after the board
317 receives the appeal. Final decisions as a result of such appeals are subject to judicial
318 review.
319 31-2-36.
320 Any savings generated by a health benefit plan, state entity, or participating ERISA plan
321 that are attributable to the implementation of an upper payment limit established by the
322 board shall be used to reduce costs to consumers, prioritizing the reduction of out-of-pocket
323 costs for prescription drugs. No later than April 1 of each calendar year, each health
324 benefit plan, state entity, and participating ERISA plan shall submit to the board, the
325 commissioner, and the Commissioner of Insurance a report describing the savings achieved
H. B. 931
- 13 -

25 LC 52 0858
326 as a result of implementing upper payment limits and how those savings were used to
327 reduce costs to consumers.
328 31-2-37.
329 (a) Any manufacturer that intends to withdraw from sale or distribution within this state
330 a prescription drug for which the board has established an upper payment limit shall
331 provide a notice of withdrawal in writing at least six months before the withdrawal to the
332 board, the commissioner, the Commissioner of Insurance, the Attorney General, and any
333 state entity with which the manufacturer has a contract for the sale or distribution of the
334 drug.
335 (b) The board shall assess a penalty not to exceed $500,000.00 if the board determines that
336 a manufacturer failed to provide the notice required by subsection (a) of this Code section
337 before withdrawing from sale or distribution within this state any prescription drug for
338 which the board has established an upper payment limit.
339 31-2-38.
340 All assessments, penalties, and donations and grants received by the board and any interest
341 earned on such shall be paid over into the general fund of the state treasury in accordance
342 with Code Section 45-12-92.
343 31-2-39.
344 No later than December 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the board shall submit a report
345 to the commissioner, the Commissioner of Insurance, the Office of Health Strategy and
346 Coordination, and the chairpersons of the House Committee on Health, the House
347 Committee on Insurance, the House Committee on Public and Community Health, the
348 Senate Health and Human Services Committee, and the Senate Insurance and Labor
349 Committee. Such report shall include the following information:
H. B. 931
- 14 -

25 LC 52 0858
350 (1) Publicly available data concerning price trends for prescription drugs;
351 (2) A list of the prescription drugs that were subjected to an affordability review by the
352 board, including the results of such affordability review;
353 (3) A list of each prescription drug for which the board established an upper payment
354 limit, including the amount of the upper payment limit;
355 (4) With respect to each prescription drug for which the board conducted an affordability
356 review, how the board determined whether the cost of such drug contributes to health
357 disparities and inequitable outcomes for underserved communities, people with
358 disabilities, older adults, or any other socially, economically, or environmentally
359 disadvantaged group;
360 (5) With respect to each drug for which the board set an upper payment limit, how the
361 board assessed health disparities and inequitable outcomes for underserved communities,
362 people with disabilities, older adults, or any other socially, economically, or
363 environmentally disadvantaged group;
364 (6) The known impact of any upper payment limits established by the board on
365 healthcare providers and pharmacies and the ability of Georgians to access such drugs;
366 (7) A summary of any appeals of decisions by the board and the outcome of any such
367 appeal;
368 (8) A description of each conflict of interest that was disclosed to the board during the
369 preceding year;
370 (9) A description of any violations of any of the provisions of this article, including an
371 indication of any enforcement action taken in response to any such violation; and
372 (10) Any recommendations the board may have for legislative and regulatory changes
373 to increase the affordability of prescription drugs and reduce the effects of costs on
374 consumers and the healthcare systems in this state.
H. B. 931
- 15 -

25 LC 52 0858
375 31-2-40.
376 The board shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions
377 of this article."
378 SECTION 4.
379 Said title is further amended in Chapter 8, relating to care and protection of indigent and
380 elderly patients, by revising Code Section 31-8-154, relating to authorized expenditure of
381 contributed funds, as follows:
382 "31-8-154.
383 All moneys contributed and revenues deposited and transferred to the trust fund pursuant
384 to this article and any interest earned on such moneys shall be appropriated to the
385 department for only the following purposes:
386 (1) To expand Medicaid eligibility and services;
387 (2) For programs to support rural and other health care healthcare providers, primarily
388 hospitals, who serve the medically indigent, provided that such programs shall negotiate
389 specialist care rates with primary healthcare programs described in paragraph (3) of this
390 Code section;
391 (3) For primary health care healthcare programs for medically indigent citizens and
392 children of this state; or
393 (4) Any combination of purposes specified in paragraphs (1) through (3) of this Code
394 section."
395 SECTION 5.
396 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
397 without such approval.
H. B. 931
- 16 -

25 LC 52 0858
398 SECTION 6.
399 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 931
- 17 -